Utah, session 2026, SB308.
Section 1. Section 78A-1-102 is repealed and reenacted to read:78A-1-102. Trial courts of record -- Geographical divisions -- Subdistricts.(1)Before July 1, 2026, the district and juvenile courts are divided into the following eight geographical divisions:(a)First Judicial District, which includes Box Elder County, Cache County, and Rich County;(b)Second Judicial District, which includes Weber County, Davis County, and Morgan County;(c)Third Judicial District, which includes Salt Lake County, Summit County, and Tooele County;(d)Fourth Judicial District, which includes Utah County, Wasatch County, Juab County, and Millard County;(e)Fifth Judicial District, which includes Beaver County, Iron County, and Washington County;(f)Sixth Judicial District, which includes Garfield County, Kane County, Piute County, Sanpete County, Sevier County, and Wayne County;(g)Seventh Judicial District, which includes Carbon County, Emery County, Grand County, and San Juan County; and(h)Eighth Judicial District, which includes Daggett County, Duchesne County, and Uintah County.(2)On and after July 1, 2026, the district and juvenile courts are divided into the following four geographical districts:(a)Northern Judicial District, which includes Box Elder County, Cache County, Rich County, Weber County, Davis County, Morgan County, Salt Lake County, Summit County, and Tooele County;(b)Western Judicial District, which includes Utah County, Wasatch County, Juab County, and Millard County;(c)Southern Judicial District, which includes Beaver County, Iron County, Washington County, Garfield County, Kane County, Piute County, Sanpete County, Sevier County, and Wayne County; and(d)Eastern Judicial District, which includes Carbon County, Emery County, Grand County, San Juan County, Daggett County, Duchesne County, and Uintah County.(3)(a)The First Judicial District, the Second Judicial District, and the Third Judicial District as they existed on June 30, 2026, are consolidated and known as the Northern Judicial District on and after July 1, 2026.(b)The Fourth Judicial district as it existed on June 30, 2026, is known as the Western Judicial District on and after July 1, 2026.(c)The Fifth Judicial District and the Sixth Judicial District as they existed on June 30, 2026, are consolidated and known as the Southern Judicial District on and after July 1, 2026.(d)The Seventh Judicial District and the Eighth Judicial District as they existed on June 30, 2026, are consolidated and known as the Eastern Judicial District on and after July 1, 2026.(4)On and after July 1, 2026, the judicial districts described in Subsection (2) are divided into subdistricts for administrative purposes as follows:(a)First Judicial District, which includes Box Elder County, Cache County, and Rich County;(b)Second Judicial District, which includes Weber County, Davis County, and Morgan County;(c)Third Judicial District, which includes Salt Lake County, Summit County, and Tooele County;(d)Fourth Judicial District, which includes Utah County, Wasatch County, Juab County, and Millard County;(e)Fifth Judicial District, which includes Beaver County, Iron County, and Washington County;(f)Sixth Judicial District, which includes Garfield County, Kane County, Piute County, Sanpete County, Sevier County, and Wayne County;(g)Seventh Judicial District, which includes Carbon County, Emery County, Grand County, and San Juan County; and(h)Eighth Judicial District, which includes Daggett County, Duchesne County, and Uintah County.(5)A judge serving in a geographical district described in Subsection (1) on June 30, 2026, is not removed from office due to the changes in geographical divisions under Subsections (2) and (3) on July 1, 2026.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 78A-1-103 is amended to read:78A-1-103. Number of district court judges.(1)TheBefore July 1, 2026, the number of district court judges is:(1)(a)four district court judges in the First Judicial District;(2)(b)14 district court judges in the Second Judicial District;(3)(c)32 33 district court judges in the Third Judicial District;(4)(d)1314 district court judges in the Fourth Judicial District;(5)(e)seveneight district court judges in the Fifth Judicial District;(6)(f)two district court judges in the Sixth Judicial District;(7)(g)three district court judges in the Seventh Judicial District; and(8)(h)three district court judges in the Eighth Judicial District.(2)On and after July 1, 2026, the number of district court judges is:(a)51 district court judges in the Northern Judicial District;(b)14 district court judges in the Western Judicial District;(c)10 district court judges in the Southern Judicial District; and(d)six district court judges in the Eastern Judicial District.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 78A-1-104 is amended to read:78A-1-104. Number of juvenile court judges.(1)TheBefore July 1, 2026, the number of juvenile court judges is:(1)(a)two juvenile court judges in the First Judicial District;(2)(b)six juvenile court judges in the Second Judicial District;(3)(c)nine juvenile court judges in the Third Judicial District;(4)(d)seven juvenile court judges in the Fourth Judicial District;(5)(e)three juvenile court judges in the Fifth Judicial District;(6)(f)two juvenile court judges in the Sixth Judicial District;(7)(g)two juvenile court judges in the Seventh Judicial District; and(8)(h)two juvenile court judges in the Eighth Judicial District.(2)On and after July 1, 2026, the number of juvenile court judges is:(a)17 juvenile court judges in the Northern Judicial District;(b)seven juvenile court judges in the Western Judicial District;(c)five juvenile court judges in the Southern Judicial District; and(d)four juvenile court judges in the Eastern Judicial District.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.